Utah statutes.
23-16-2.   Removal of big game animals doing damage.

The director of the division of Wildlife Resources may authorize the removal of big game animals when they are doing actual damage. Animals so removed shall be sold or otherwise disposed of by the Division of Wildlife Resources, and any money derived from the sale of these animals shall be placed in the Wildlife Resources Account.

